District of Columbia statutes.
5-333.10

Authorized public activities.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be interpreted as prohibiting any MPD member from, in the course of their duties, visiting any place, and attending any event that is open to the public, or reviewing information that is in the public domain, on the same terms and conditions as members of the public, so long as members have a legitimate law enforcement objective; provided, that any undercover activities shall be authorized as required by § 5-333.07.

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-352, § 210, 52 DCR 2296

History